Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Brooklyn Park for the Brooklyn Park Small Business Center and for the city to expand the workforce development programming of Brooklyn Park and Brooklyn Center through workforce development programs serving primarily underrepresented populations, including such programs as Brooklynk, Career Pathways, Youth Entrepreneurship, and Community Partnership. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end